Maryland, session 2025, HB0448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless a
different meaning is clearly intended from the context.
(B–1) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(b–1)] (B–2) “Address confidentiality program” means the Address
Confidentiality Program administered by the Secretary of State under Title 7, Subtitle 3 of
the State Government Article.
[(b–2)] (B–3) “Administrative policy affecting voting rights” means any action
relating to voter registration, provisional voting, absentee voting, or the location of a polling
place or early voting center.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 254
(TT–1) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
3–202.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Common access card” means the identification card issued by the U.S.
Department of Defense to active–duty [military personnel] MEMBERS OF THE
UNIFORMED SERVICES, eligible [reserve personnel] MEMBERS OF A RESERVE
COMPONENT, Department of Defense civilian employees, and eligible Department of
Defense contractor personnel.
(3) “Federal post card application” means the form prescribed under 52
U.S.C. § 20301(b)(2) that may be used by absent uniformed services voters and overseas
voters to simultaneously apply to register to vote and apply for an absentee ballot.
(4) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(5) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
5–304.
(b) A certificate of candidacy may be filed as permitted under subsection (a)(1)(ii)
of this section, if:
(1) the individual filing the certificate is unable to do so in person because
of illness, [military] service IN THE UNIFORMED SERVICES, or temporary absence from
the State; and
(2) the certificate is accompanied by an affidavit signed by the individual
filing the certificate setting forth fully the facts that prevent that individual from filing the
certificate in person.
Article – General Provisions
1–101.1.
“ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–101.2.
– 3 –

Ch. 254 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
“ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–103.1.
“ARMED FORCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–114.1.
“RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–114.2.
“SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–116.
“UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–117.
(A) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) With respect to any State program of benefits, rights, or privileges applicable
to a veteran under this Code, “veteran” includes[, if the individual is eligible under 38
U.S.C. § 101, a member of the commissioned corps of:
(1) the Public Health Service; or
(2) the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration or its
predecessor, the Coast and Geodetic Survey] AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MEETS THE
DEFINITION OF “VETERAN” UNDER § 9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Article – Public Utilities
18–111.
(a) (1) In this section, [“eligible veteran” means THE FOLLOWING WORDS
HAVE THE MEANINGS INDICATED.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 254
(2) “ELIGIBLE VETERAN” MEANS a veteran of any branch of the armed
forces of the United States UNIFORMED SERVICES who has received an honorable
discharge or a certificate of satisfactory completion of military service, including:
(1) the National Guard;
(2) the military reserves;
(3) (I) A RESERVE COMPONENT;
(II) the Commissioned Corps of the Public Health Service; and
(4) (III) the Commissioned Corps of the National Oceanic and
Atmospheric Administration] “VETERAN” HAS.
(3) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(4) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(b) The Commission may grant a preference in hiring and promotion to:
(1) [an eligible] A veteran;
(2) the spouse of [an eligible] A veteran who has a service–connected
disability; or
(3) the surviving spouse of a deceased [eligible] veteran.
(c) Granting a preference under subsection (b) of this section does not violate any
State or local equal employment opportunity law.
Article – State Government
2–104.
(d) Any full–time permanent employee of the General Assembly of Maryland or
the Department of Legislative Services who separates from State service and returns to
State service in the Executive or Judicial Branch within 3 years from the time of separation
from active duty, AS DEFINED IN § 9–901 OF THIS ARTICLE, shall be eligible for
reinstatement and shall receive full credit for any prior State service.
3–303.
– 5 –

Ch. 254 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) The Governor is the commander–in–chief of the land and naval militia of the
State, except for any part of the militia that is in the active [military] service of the [United
States] UNIFORMED SERVICES.
9–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
(C) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS:
(1) AN ACTIVE DUTY MEMBER OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES; OR
(2) SERVING IN A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE UNIFORMED
SERVICES ON ACTIVE DUTY ORDERS.
(D) “ARMED FORCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 10 U.S.C. § 101.
[(b)] (E) “Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Maryland Veterans Trust.
[(c)] (F) “Department” means the Department of Veterans and Military
Families.
(G) “MILITARY FAMILY” INCLUDES THE SPOUSE AND DEPENDENT
CHILDREN OF A SERVICE MEMBER OR VETERAN RELATED BY BLOOD, MARRIAGE, OR
ADOPTION.
(H) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
[(d)] (I) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Veterans and Military Families.
(J) “SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A MEMBER OF:
(1) THE UNIFORMED SERVICES; OR
(2) A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES.
[(e)] (K) “Trust” means the Maryland Veterans Trust.
(L) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 254
[(f)] (M) Except as otherwise provided [in this subtitle], “veteran” [means an
individual who served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, other than
for training, and was discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable] HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN 38 U.S.C. § 101.
9–902.
(a) There is a Department of Veterans and Military Families, established as a
principal department of the State government.
(b) The head of the Department is the Secretary of Veterans and Military
Families who shall be:
(1) a veteran [who has an honorable discharge from active service with a
uniformed service of the United States]; and
(2) appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.
(c) (1) The Secretary serves at the pleasure of the Governor and is responsible
directly to the Governor. The Secretary shall advise the Governor on all matters assigned
to the Department and is responsible for carrying out the Governor’s policies on these
matters.
(2) The Secretary is responsible for:
(I) the operation of the Department and shall establish guidelines
and procedures to promote the orderly and efficient operation of the Department; AND
(II) THE DEVELOPMENT OF COORDINATED POLICIES FOR
LEADING VETERANS, SERVICE MEMBERS, AND THEIR FAMILIES THROUGH LIFE’S
TRANSITIONS, INCLUDING ASSISTING IN SECURING BENEFITS EARNED THROUGH
SERVICE IN THE UNIFORMED SERVICES AND RESERVE COMPONENTS.
(3) Subject to the provisions of this subtitle, the Secretary may establish,
reorganize, or consolidate areas of responsibility in the Department as necessary to fulfill
the duties assigned by the Secretary.
(4) The Secretary shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the
provisions of this subtitle.
(d) The Secretary is entitled to the salary provided in the State budget.
9–906.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 7 –

Ch. 254 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) In this section and in § 9–907 of this subtitle, “veteran” means an
individual who:
(i) served other than dishonorably on active duty in the [armed
forces of the United States] UNIFORMED SERVICES; or
(ii) served other than dishonorably as a member of the State militia
ordered into active service [of the United States] by order of the President and was killed
in the line of duty.
(f) To qualify for a plot in a State veterans’ cemetery:
(1) the applicant must be a veteran who meets the requirements for burial
at a national veterans’ cemetery or an eligible spouse or dependent of a veteran who meets
the requirements of this subsection; and
(2) if a veteran, the veteran must also have been a resident of the State:
(i) when the veteran entered the [armed forces] UNIFORMED
SERVICES;
(ii) when the veteran died; or
(iii) for 2 years, unless, for a reason that the Department finds
compelling, the Department waives the time period.
9–906.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) IN THIS SECTION AND IN § 9–907 OF THIS SUBTITLE, “ELIGIBLE
DECEDENT” MEANS:
(I) A VETERAN;
(II) A QUALIFIED RESERVE MEMBER; OR
(III) AN ELIGIBLE SPOUSE OR DEPENDENT.
(3) “Eligible dependent” means:
(i) a child who meets the requirements stated in 38 C.F.R. §
38.620(e); [or]
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 254
(ii) a parent who meets the requirements stated in 38 C.F.R. §
38.620(i); OR
(III) A PARENT OR CHILD RELATED BY BLOOD, MARRIAGE, OR
ADOPTION OF A QUALIFIED RESERVE MEMBER.
[(3)] (4) “Eligible spouse” means:
(I) a spouse who meets the requirements stated in 38 C.F.R. §
38.620(e); OR
(II) A SPOUSE OF A QUALIFIED RESERVE MEMBER.
(5) “QUALIFIED RESERVE MEMBER” MEANS A RESERVE COMPONENT
MEMBER WHO DOES NOT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS FOR BURIAL AT A NATIONAL
VETERANS’ CEMETERY BUT SERVED OTHER THAN DISHONORABLY AND COMPLETED
THE INDIVIDUAL’S CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATION OF SERVICE.
[(4)] (6) “State veterans’ cemetery” means a cemetery that the
Department establishes under this section.
[(5) In this section and in § 9–907 of this subtitle, “veteran” means an
individual who:
(i) served other than dishonorably on active duty in the armed
forces of the United States; or
(ii) served other than dishonorably as a member of the State militia
ordered into active service of the United States by order of the President and was killed in
the line of duty.
(6)] (7) “Washington Cemetery” means the Civil War cemetery grounds
authorized by Chapter 213 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 1870.
(b) The Department may establish one or more cemeteries in the State for the
burial of [veterans and their eligible spouse or dependents] ELIGIBLE DECEDENTS as
authorized by the Secretary.
(c) The Department may accept land, on behalf of the State or a political
subdivision of the State, or otherwise acquire land for a State veterans’ cemetery, if the
Department has the approval of:
(1) the governing body of the county where the State veterans’ cemetery is
to be located;
– 9 –

Ch. 254 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) the delegation in the General Assembly for the county where the State
veterans’ cemetery is to be located; and
(3) the Board of Public Works.
(d) (1) The Department shall maintain and supervise each State veterans’
cemetery.
(2) The Washington Cemetery shall be under the supervision of the
Department.
(e) The Department shall provide a plot in a State veterans’ cemetery, without
charge, to a veteran OR A VETERAN’S ELIGIBLE SPOUSE OR DEPENDENT who meets the
requirements of this section.
(f) To qualify for a plot in a State veterans’ cemetery:
(1) the [applicant] ELIGIBLE DECEDENT must be:
(I) a veteran who meets the requirements for burial at a national
veterans’ cemetery;
(II) A QUALIFIED RESERVE MEMBER; or
(III) an eligible spouse or dependent [of a veteran] who meets the
requirements of this subsection; and
(2) if a [veteran, the veteran] QUALIFIED RESERVE MEMBER, THE
QUALIFIED RESERVE MEMBER must also have been a resident of the State:
(i) when the [veteran] QUALIFIED RESERVE MEMBER entered the
[armed forces] RESERVE COMPONENT;
(ii) when the [veteran] QUALIFIED RESERVE MEMBER died; or
(iii) for 2 years, unless, for a reason that the Department finds
compelling, the Department waives the time period.
(g) To obtain a plot in a State veterans’ cemetery, an applicant shall submit to
the Department an application on the form that the Department provides.
(h) (1) In a plot that is allotted to a veteran OR A QUALIFIED RESERVE
MEMBER, the Department shall bury:
(i) the veteran OR QUALIFIED RESERVE MEMBER; and
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 254
(ii) any member of the immediate family who is an eligible spouse or
dependent [of the veteran] if the family member can be buried in a space above or below
the veteran OR QUALIFIED RESERVE MEMBER or in the next available plot.
(2) With each plot, the Department shall provide a grave liner at no cost
for the veteran or THE VETERAN’S eligible spouse or dependent.
(i) (1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE Department [shall bury the] MAY NOT CHARGE A veteran or A
VETERAN’S eligible spouse or dependent [without charge] FOR BURIAL.
(2) IF THE INDIVIDUAL BEING BURIED IS A QUALIFIED RESERVE
MEMBER OR A QUALIFIED RESERVE MEMBER’S ELIGIBLE SPOUSE OR DEPENDENT,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLECT AT THE TIME OF BURIAL A FEE THAT IS EQUAL
TO THE ANNUAL PLOT ALLOWANCE ESTABLISHED BY THE NATIONAL CEMETERY
ADMINISTRATION.
9–907.
The Department shall keep a registry of the graves of [veterans and family members
of veterans] ELIGIBLE DECEDENTS who are buried in the State veterans’ cemeteries.
9–910.
(b) (1) The Department may appoint a Director for the home and employ any
other staff that is needed to manage the home properly.
(2) In appointing or employing staff, the Department shall give preference
to a veteran [who has an honorable discharge from the armed forces UNIFORMED
SERVICES].
(3) The Director shall:
(i) serve at the pleasure of the Secretary; and
(ii) perform any duty that the Department requires.
9–911.
(a) In accordance with the regulations of the Department and applicable law, the
home shall be open:
(1) to a veteran who[:
– 11 –

Ch. 254 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) has an honorable discharge from active service with a uniformed
service of the United States; and
(ii)] is a resident of the State as defined in regulations adopted by the
Secretary; or
(2) to a spouse of an eligible veteran.
9–946.
The Secretary shall submit a report by December 31 of each year to the Governor
and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of this article, the General Assembly, that includes:
(6) the estimated impact current [military] operations are likely to have
on the needs of veterans in the future;
(7) the status of federal veterans programs as they relate to Maryland
veterans; [and]
(8) any other issues concerning veterans that the Secretary considers
appropriate; AND
(9) ANY OTHER ISSUES CONCERNING SERVICE MEMBERS, INCLUDING
ISSUES UNIQUELY PERTAINING TO ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBERS THAT THE
SECRETARY CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE.
9–957.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible veteran” means [an individual who:
(i) served on active duty in:
1. the armed forces of the United States;
2. the National Guard; or
3. a reserve component of the armed forces of the United
States;
(ii) served in a capacity other than for training;
(iii) was discharged or released under conditions other than
dishonorable; and] A VETERAN WHO:
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 254
[(iv) 1.] (I) is a resident of the State; or
[2.] (II) receives treatment or care from a U.S. Department
of Veterans Affairs or U.S. Department of Defense medical facility in the State.
20–101.
(a) In Subtitles 1 through 11 of this title the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(f) “Military status” means the status of being:
(1) a member of the uniformed services[, as defined in 10 U.S.C. § 101];
(2) a member of a reserve component of the [armed forces of the United
States, as listed in 10 U.S.C. § 10101] UNIFORMED SERVICES; or
(3) a dependent, as defined in 50 U.S.C. § 3911(4).
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 13 –